Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 15 Administrative Procedures
Arkansas Veterinary Medical Examining Board's findings that a veterinarian violated §17-101-305(a)(5) and Board Regulations 19F, 19L, and 19O, were not supported by substantial evidence because these provisions required expert evidence of the standard of care, and no such evidence was presented.Zepecki v. Ark. Veterinary Med. Examining Bd., 2010 Ark. App. 187, 375 S.W.3d 41 (2010).

Decision by the Appraiser Licensing and Certification Board that a real estate appraiser had violated several standards of appraisal practice was properly overturned because the Board's findings of fact did not correlate with its conclusions of law relating to the professional standards that it found that the appraiser had violated. Since the Board's conclusions of law were without adequate corresponding factual support, they lacked substantial evidence and were arbitrary and capricious.Ark. Appraiser Licensing v. Quast, 2010 Ark. App. 511 (2010).

Because the Capitol Zoning District Commission's decision denying a property owner's application to install a 48-inch-high fence was supported by substantial evidence, it was not arbitrary and capricious.Capitol Zoning Dist. Comm'n v. Cowan, 2012 Ark. App. 619, 429 S.W.3d 267 (2012).

There was substantial evidence to support the Capitol Zoning District Commission's decision denying a property owner's application to install a 48-inch-high fence. The owner's property was one of the most historic residences in all of Arkansas, and surrounding properties traditionally had fences at or under 40 inches in height.Capitol Zoning Dist. Comm'n v. Cowan, 2012 Ark. App. 619, 429 S.W.3d 267 (2012).

There was substantial evidence to support the finding that the prior felony conviction should not be waived to allow the applicant to offer counseling, because the Arkansas Board of Examiners in Counseling found that the applicant's testimony that there would be no future aberrations in his behavior was not credible.Beavers v. Ark. Bd. of Examiners in Counseling, 2013 Ark. App. 222, 427 S.W.3d 130 (2013).

Administrative law judge (ALJ) said the mother was carelessly swinging a belt at the child and knowingly struck him, but the two adverbs of “carelessly” and “knowingly” were diametrically opposed and invalidated the reasoning behind her conclusion that the mother abused her child, and the facts did not rise to the level of substantial evidence to support the ALJ's decision; the mother accidentally hit the child in the face as he was moving, which did not rise to the level of knowingly or intentionally as required by statute.Ark. Dep't of Human Servs., Div. of Children & Family Servs. v. Nelson, 2015 Ark. App. 98, 455 S.W.3d 859 (2015).

There was substantial evidence to support the revocation of the license of a title insurance company owner because there was a longtime pattern of poor record-keeping, poor management, and questionable business practices that enabled the owner's employee to commit fraud; and the owner disregarded the sanctity of escrow accounts and failed to place correct information on title policies regarding his license, business name, and the required statutory notices. Moreover, the sanction was not too harsh because revocation was an available sanction for the violations that occurred.Dyer v. Ark. Ins. Dep't, 2015 Ark. App. 446, 468 S.W.3d 303 (2015).

Substantial evidence supported the decision of the Department of Human Services that a teacher had committed sexual abuse of a minor student and ordering that the teacher's name be placed in the Child Maltreatment Central Registry, even though the criminal charges had been dropped; the ALJ had clearly considered the teacher's defenses and rejected them, the appellate court does not act as a super factfinder, and the teacher could not complain that he was denied an opportunity to cross-examine the student when he failed to subpoena her.J.C. v. Ark. Dep't of Human Servs., 2019 Ark. App. 131, 572 S.W.3d 878 (2019).

Administrative action may be regarded as arbitrary and capricious only where it is not supportable on any rational basis. Partlow v. Arkansas State Police Comm'n, 271 Ark. 351, 609 S.W.2d 23 (1980).

To set aside administrative action as arbitrary and capricious, it must be proven that it was willful and unreasoning action, without consideration and with a disregard of the facts or circumstances of the case. Partlow v. Arkansas State Police Comm'n, 271 Ark. 351, 609 S.W.2d 23 (1980); Ark. State Bd. of Nursing v. Long, 8 Ark. App. 288, 651 S.W.2d 109 (1983); Garner v. Foundation Life Ins. Co., 17 Ark. App. 13, 702 S.W.2d 417 (1986).

The requirement that administrative action not be arbitrary or capricious is less demanding than the requirement that it be supported by substantial evidence; in order for the action to be invalid as arbitrary, the action must lack rational basis or hinge on a finding of fact based on an erroneous view of the law, and the action is not arbitrary simply because the reviewing court would act differently. Woodyard v. Arkansas Diversified Ins. Co., 268 Ark. 94, 594 S.W.2d 13 (1980); In re Sugarloaf Mining Co., 310 Ark. 772, 840 S.W.2d 172 (1992).

Agency action held not arbitrary, capricious, or characterized by an abuse of discretion. Partlow v. Arkansas State Police Comm'n, 271 Ark. 351, 609 S.W.2d 23 (1980); Huth v. Division of Social Servs. of Dep't of Human Servs., 287 Ark. 294, 698 S.W.2d 789 (1985); Garner v. Foundation Life Ins. Co., 17 Ark. App. 13, 702 S.W.2d 417 (1986).

Agency action held to be arbitrary, capricious, or an abuse of discretion. Division of Social Servs. v. Oak Hills Corp., 287 Ark. 32, 695 S.W.2d 836 (1985); Wright v. Ark. State Plant Bd., 311 Ark. 125, 842 S.W.2d 42 (1992).

Even though the director for the Arkansas Tobacco Control Board sent the tobacco company an offer of settlement “recommending” a $500 fine for the tobacco company which gave unlawful rebates to retailers, and the company accepted the offer, the defense of agency estoppel was not preserved, and because the evidence established that the company had paid rebates to at least 28 Arkansas retail establishments, it was not arbitrary or capricious for the Board to reject the “recommendation” and impose a $28,000 fine and suspension of the company's permit for six months. H.T. Hackney Co. v. Davis, 353 Ark. 797, 120 S.W.3d 79 (2003).

Trial court determined that the administrative law judge acted arbitrarily in determining that the husband's annuity was purchased to assist the institutionalized spouse in qualifying for Medicaid benefits; however, the appellate court reversed and remanded for further findings as the Arkansas Department of Human Services did not properly complete the eligibility worksheet to determine eligibility. Ark. Dep't of Human Servs. v. Schroder, 353 Ark. 885, 122 S.W.3d 10 (2003).

Administrative law judge's finding that a stepfather, who acted at the direction of and in concert with the natural mother in disciplining their children with respect to a specific incident, was not entitled to the protection of the reasonable and moderate discipline exception under §12-12-503(2)(C)(i), was arbitrary, capricious, and an abuse of discretion. Dep't of Human Servs. v. Parker, 88 Ark. App. 222, 197 S.W.3d 33, 2004 Ark. App. LEXIS 769 (2004).

Board of Embalmers and Funeral Directors'denial of the request for licensure reinstatement of appellants, a funeral director and her funeral establishment was not arbitrary and capricious because the record demonstrated that appellants engaged in a systematic course of committing violations, resulting in suspensions, probation, and ultimately revocation of their funeral-director and funeral-establishment licenses and that even after their licenses were revoked, appellants continued to conduct funerals in violation of the statutes.Collins v. Ark. Bd. of Embalmers & Funeral Dirs., 2013 Ark. App. 678, 430 S.W.3d 213 (2013).

If an agency's action is supported by substantial evidence, then it follows automatically that the decision cannot be characterized as arbitrary and capricious.Reynolds v. Ark. Appraiser Licensing & Certification Bd., 2019 Ark. App. 587, 591 S.W.3d 837 (2019).

Circuit court properly reversed an administrative decision that parents neglected their children as there was no substantial evidence to support a finding that the children were placed in danger by the parents by allowing them to spend the night with their step-grandfather, a convicted sex offender, following their grandmother's death, especially where those visits went without any suggestion of abuse. Ark. Dep't of Human Servs. v. Bixler, 91 Ark. App. 277, 210 S.W.3d 135 (2005), rev'd, 364 Ark. 292, 219 S.W.3d 125 (2005).

The requirement that the action of the board be supported by sufficient evidence does not place upon the board the burden of presenting evidence that a petition should be denied nor relieve the petitioner of the burden of presenting evidence sufficient to justify the granting of the petition. Gray's Butane Whsle., Inc. v. Arkansas Liquefied Petro. Gas Bd., 250 Ark. 69, 463 S.W.2d 639 (1971).

Substantial evidence supported agency decision. White County Guar. Sav. & Loan Ass'n v. F & M Bank, 262 Ark. 893, 562 S.W.2d 582 (1978); Woodyard v. Arkansas Diversified Ins. Co., 268 Ark. 94, 594 S.W.2d 13 (1980); Garner v. Foundation Life Ins. Co., 17 Ark. App. 13, 702 S.W.2d 417 (1986).

Substantial evidence is valid, legal, and persuasive evidence that a reasonable mind might accept as adequate to support a conclusion. Partlow v. Arkansas State Police Comm'n, 271 Ark. 351, 609 S.W.2d 23 (1980); Ark. State Bd. of Nursing v. Long, 8 Ark. App. 288, 651 S.W.2d 109 (1983); Arkansas Real Estate Comm'n v. Hale, 12 Ark. App. 229, 674 S.W.2d 507 (1984).

On appeal, the court gives the evidence its strongest probative force in favor of the administrative agency. Williams v. Scott, 278 Ark. 453, 647 S.W.2d 115 (1983); Arkansas Dep't of Human Servs. v. Simes, 281 Ark. 81, 661 S.W.2d 378 (1983).

In order to establish an absence of substantial evidence to support the decision, the appellant must demonstrate that the proof before the administrative tribunal was so nearly undisputed that fair-minded men could not reach its conclusion. The question is not whether the testimony would have supported a contrary finding but whether it supports the finding that was made. Williams v. Scott, 278 Ark. 453, 647 S.W.2d 115 (1983); Wright v. Ark. State Plant Bd., 311 Ark. 125, 842 S.W.2d 42 (1992).

Evidence insufficient to support agency decision. Arkansas Dep't of Human Servs. v. Simes, 281 Ark. 81, 661 S.W.2d 378 (1983); Fouch v. State, Alcoholic Beverage Control Div., 10 Ark. App. 139, 662 S.W.2d 181, 1983 Ark. App. LEXIS 935 (1983).

Substantial evidence means relevant evidence that a reasonable mind might accept as adequate to support the conclusion based on a review of the entire record. Woodyard v. Arkansas Diversified Ins. Co., 268 Ark. 94, 594 S.W.2d 13 (1980); Fouch v. State, Alcoholic Beverage Control Div., 10 Ark. App. 139, 662 S.W.2d 181, 1983 Ark. App. LEXIS 935 (1983).

In applying subsection (h) to child abuse reporting cases, an administrative decision is reviewed under the same credible evidence standard, rather than the substantial evidence standard, however the remaining portions of that subsection remain in effect. DeWeese v. Polk County Children & Family Servs., 40 Ark. App. 139, 842 S.W.2d 466 (1992).

Substantial evidence did not support the decision placing the employee on the certified nursing abuse registry because the administrative law judge did not make the requisite findings to support the violation she found; the administrative law judge concluded that the employee's conduct was abusive under §5-28-101(1), without specifying which of the two definitions of abuse in the provision she was applying. Arkansas Dep't of Human Servs. v. Haen, 81 Ark. App. 171, 100 S.W.3d 740, 2003 Ark. App. LEXIS 206 (2003).

There was substantial evidence to support the Arkansas State Board of Physical Therapy's decision to suspend physical therapist, with probation thereafter, where during the hearing, there was evidence produced that the physical therapist and the patient engaged in kissing, hugging, and heavy petting during the course of her treatment, and there was also testimony that the physical therapist made very intimate and personal comments to the patient during treatment, and the two had intercourse within at least two weeks of the patient's final therapy session. Williams v. Ark. State Bd. of Physical Therapy, 353 Ark. 778, 120 S.W.3d 581 (2003).

Circuit court properly affirmed the decision of the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System (ATRS) because substantial evidence supported its finding that a school district was responsible for paying the employer contribution to ATRS on settlement proceeds a teacher received and that it failed to follow the calculation of damages designated in the settlement as back pay.Palestine-Wheatley Sch. Dist. v. Hopkins, 2016 Ark. App. 112, 484 S.W.3d 682 (2016).

Circuit court did not fail to consider whether substantial evidence supported the decision of the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System because it recited the standard of review applicable, specifically noting the standard of whether there was substantial evidence to support the agency's findings; the circuit court found that the decision of the administrative hearing officer from which the appeal arose was supported by substantial evidence.Palestine-Wheatley Sch. Dist. v. Hopkins, 2016 Ark. App. 112, 484 S.W.3d 682 (2016).

Where an appraiser was sanctioned by the appraiser board for a deficient appraisal, the fact that the board's chief investigator did not review certain documents until the hearing did not, by itself, render the board's decision without substantial evidence to support it.Reynolds v. Ark. Appraiser Licensing & Certification Bd., 2019 Ark. App. 587, 591 S.W.3d 837 (2019).

Circuit court erred in dismissing with prejudice, based on sovereign immunity, an administrative appeal from final orders of the Oil and Gas Commission because sovereign immunity was not implicated where the commission was not “made a defendant” as contemplated by the state constitution; the commission's role in the proceeding was that of a tribunal or a quasi-judicial decision-maker rather than a real party in interest. It followed that the circuit court's rulings declaring the adjudicatory provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act unconstitutional and invalidating the commission's orders as void ab initio also were reversed.Ark. Oil & Gas Comm'n v. Hurd, 2018 Ark. 397, 564 S.W.3d 248 (2018).

Since the Arkansas Department of Labor is covered under the Administrative Procedure Act both, employer and employee have the right to institute an original action in a court of law. United States Rooter All Type Plumbing Co. v. Holliman, 50 Ark. App. 125, 900 S.W.2d 580 (1995).

The court rejected the contention that when an individual does not appear in the proceedings below, but seeks to appeal a final action under the Administrative Procedures Act, he must set out in his petition how the issuance of the permit will harm him; instead, in order to have standing, a petitioner must assert in his pleadings how he has already sustained or is immediately in danger of sustaining injury either in his person, business, or property as a consequence of the final action. Ark. Alcoholic Bev. Control v. Muncrief, 74 Ark. App. 221, 45 S.W.3d 438 (2001).

There is no need for Arkansas courts to resort to the requirements for standing under the federal Administrative Procedure Act when determining standing under §25-15-212(a); a petitioner under the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act (APA), §§25-15-201 to25-15-217, did not have to show an “injury in fact” and that such injury was within the “zone of interests” sought to be protected, as those terms were used under the federal Administrative Procedure Act, because the Arkansas APA did not have the same requirements as the federal Administrative Procedure Act.Ark. Bev. Retailers Ass'n v. Moore, 369 Ark. 498, 256 S.W.3d 488 (2007).

Liquor store retailers'association had standing under §25-15-212(a) to challenge a decision of the Arkansas Alcoholic Beverage Control Board, which granted permits to a department store, based on the association's claims of disparate treatment under §3-4-218 and its members'inability to compete on an equal basis with the store.Ark. Bev. Retailers Ass'n v. Moore, 369 Ark. 498, 256 S.W.3d 488 (2007).

In an appeal by parents of the Arkansas State Board of Education's decision to close a K-12 school campus under §6-20-602(a), the parents'allegation that their children would suffer a negative impact on their academic achievement due to the Board's approval of the school district's petition for closure was sufficient injury to confer standing under this section.Walker v. Ark. State Bd. of Educ., 2010 Ark. 277, 365 S.W.3d 899 (2010).

Competitor challenging the transfer of a retail liquor permit sufficiently alleged standing pursuant to subsection (a) of this section and standing was not challenged by the permit holder or the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board. The circuit court erred by raising the standing issue sua sponte and finding that it lacked jurisdiction to consider the petition, as the issue of standing is not akin to subject-matter jurisdiction; instead, it is a defense that may be waived by the parties.Gildehaus v. Ark. ABC Bd., 2016 Ark. 414, 503 S.W.3d 789 (2016).

Retail liquor permittee had standing to petition for review of the decision granting a competitor's liquor-permit application where he held a permit for a nearby location that would have been in direct competition with the competitor's store.Moore v. Ark. ABC Bd., 2016 Ark. 422, 503 S.W.3d 796 (2016).

Cited: Norton v. Blaylock, 409 F.2d 772 (8th Cir. Ark. 1969); Floyd v. Ark. State Bd. of Pharmacy, 248 Ark. 459, 451 S.W.2d 874 (1970); Ark. State Bd. of Pharmacy v. Whayne, 248 Ark. 934, 454 S.W.2d 667 (1970); Arkansas State Racing Comm'n v. Sayler, 249 Ark. 913, 462 S.W.2d 472 (1971); Ark. Sav. & Loan Ass'n Bd. v. Corning Sav. & Loan Ass'n, 252 Ark. 264, 478 S.W.2d 431 (1972); Norton v. Blaylock, 285 F. Supp. 659 (W.D. Ark. 1973); Hickman v. Arkansas Bd. of Pardons & Paroles, 361 F. Supp. 864 (E.D. Ark. 1973); Jarvis v. ABC Bd., 253 Ark. 728, 488 S.W.2d 712 (1973); Arkansas Racing Comm'n v. Emprise Corp., 254 Ark. 975, 497 S.W.2d 34 (1973); Thomas v. Committee “A” Thomas, 255 Ark. 517, 255 Ark. 517, 501 S.W.2d 248, 1973 Ark. LEXIS 1398 (1973); Selig v. Novak, 256 Ark. 278, 506 S.W.2d 825 (1974); Hewitt v. Gage, 257 Ark. 579, 519 S.W.2d 749 (1975); Jones v. Reed, 267 Ark. 237, 590 S.W.2d 6 (1979); Citizens Bank v. Arkansas State Banking Bd., 271 Ark. 703, 610 S.W.2d 257 (1981); Snyder v. ABC Bd., 1 Ark. App. 92, 613 S.W.2d 126 (1981); Copeland v. ABC Bd., 4 Ark. App. 143, 628 S.W.2d 588 (1982); Rowell v. Austin, 276 Ark. 445, 637 S.W.2d 531 (1982); Johnson v. Ark. ABC Bd., 6 Ark. App. 366, 642 S.W.2d 335 (1982); Fayetteville School Dist. No. 1 v. ABC Bd., 279 Ark. 89, 648 S.W.2d 804 (1983); Arkansas Dep't of Human Servs. v. Donis, 280 Ark. 169, 655 S.W.2d 452 (1983); ABC Div. v. Barnett, 285 Ark. 189, 685 S.W.2d 511 (1985); Livingston v. Ark. State Medical Bd., 288 Ark. 1, 701 S.W.2d 361 (1986); Patterson v. Hillcrest Home, 299 Ark. 27, 770 S.W.2d 654 (1989); Arkansas State Bd. of Cosmetology v. Roberts, 28 Ark. App. 249, 772 S.W.2d 624 (1989); Ark. Dep't of Human Servs. v. Heath, 307 Ark. 147, 817 S.W.2d 885 (1991); Edwards v. ABC Div. Bd., 307 Ark. 245, 819 S.W.2d 271 (1991); Hollabaugh v. Ark. State Medical Bd., 43 Ark. App. 83, 861 S.W.2d 317 (1993); Ark. Dep't of Human Servs. v. Walters, 315 Ark. 204, 866 S.W.2d 823 (1993); Volunteer Council v. Governmental Bonding Bd., 319 Ark. 716, 894 S.W.2d 580 (1995); Thomas v. Arkansas Dep't of Human Servs., 319 Ark. 782, 894 S.W.2d 584 (1995); Bohannon v. Ark. State Bd. of Nursing, 320 Ark. 169, 895 S.W.2d 923 (1995); Regional Care Facilities, Inc. v. Rose Care, Inc., 322 Ark. 767, 912 S.W.2d 409 (1995); Douglass v. Nationwide Mut. Ins. Co., 323 Ark. 105, 913 S.W.2d 277 (1996); Ark. Appraiser Licensing & Certification Bd. v. Fletcher, 326 Ark. 628, 933 S.W.2d 789 (1996); Mid-South Rd. Bldrs., Inc. v. Ark. Contractors Licensing Bd., 328 Ark. 630, 946 S.W.2d 649 (1997); Social Work Licensing Bd. v. Moncebaiz, 332 Ark. 67, 962 S.W.2d 797 (1998); Ark. Bd. of Exm'rs. v. Carlson, 334 Ark. 614, 976 S.W.2d 934 (1998); Ark. Bd. of Registration for Professional Geologists v. Ackley, 64 Ark. App. 325, 984 S.W.2d 67 (1998); Brown v. Ark. State Heating, Ventilation, Air Conditioning & Refrigeration Licensing Bd., 336 Ark. 34, 984 S.W.2d 402 (1999); McQuay v. Arkansas State Bd. of Architects, 337 Ark. 339, 989 S.W.2d 499 (1999); Ford v. Keith, 338 Ark. 487, 996 S.W.2d 20 (1999); Ark. Contractors Licensing Bd. v. Pegasus Renovation Co., 347 Ark. 320, 64 S.W.3d 241 (2001); Ark. Prof'l Bail Bondsman Licensing Bd. v. Oudin, 348 Ark. 48, 69 S.W.3d 855 (2002); Van Curen v. Ark. Prof'l Bail Bondsman Licensing Bd., 79 Ark. App. 43, 84 S.W.3d 47 (2002); Holloway v. State Bd. of Architects, 79 Ark. App. 200, 86 S.W.3d 391 (2002); Ark. Dep't of Human Servs. v. Campbell, 87 Ark. App. 206, 189 S.W.3d 495 (2004); Mann v. Ark. Prof'l Bail Bondsman Licensing Bd., 88 Ark. App. 393, 199 S.W.3d 84 (2004); Batiste v. Ark. Dep't of Human Servs., 361 Ark. 46, 204 S.W.3d 521 (2005); Hanks v. Sneed, 366 Ark. 371, 235 S.W.3d 883 (2006); Linell v. Norris, 320 S.W.3d 642 (2009); Gilmore v. Ark. Bd. of Registration for Prof'l Eng'rs & Land Surveyors, 2011 Ark. App. 139, 381 S.W.3d 860 (2011); Hester v. Ark. Prof'l Bail Bondsman Licensing Bd., 2011 Ark. App. 389, 383 S.W.3d 925 (2011); Marrufo v. Ark. Dep't of Human Servs., 2013 Ark. 323, 429 S.W.3d 210 (2013); Halstead v. Sex Offender Assessment Comm., 2013 Ark. App. 445 (2013); Brown v. Sex Offender Assessment Comm., 2014 Ark. App. 236 (2014); Odyssey Healthcare Operating A. LP v. Ark. Dep't of Human Servs., 2015 Ark. App. 459, 469 S.W.3d 381 (2015); McCormick v. Ark. State Med. Bd., 2017 Ark. App. 697, 545 S.W.3d 776 (2017).

History.

Acts 1967, No. 434, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-705.